Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1912
Signing false document; penalty.

(a) A person commits an offense by signing a document such person knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

(b) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 12.